New York, session 2025-2026, A10527.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 1225-d of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by section 7 of part B of chapter 55 of the laws of 3 2014, is amended to read as follows: 4 6. A violation of this section shall be a traffic infraction and shall 5 be punishable by a fine of [not less than fifty dollars nor more than 6 two] five hundred dollars upon conviction of a first violation; upon 7 conviction of a second violation, both of which were committed within a 8 period of eighteen months, such violation shall be punished by a fine of 9 [not less than fifty dollars nor more than two hundred fifty] one thou- 10 sand dollars; and upon conviction of a third or subsequent violation, 11 all of which were committed within a period of eighteen months, such 12 violation shall be punished by a fine of [not less than fifty dollars 13 nor more than four hundred fifty] two thousand dollars. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13705-01-5